District of Columbia statutes.
7-2341.14

License and certification renewal.

(a)

An application for renewal of a license or certification shall be submitted to the Mayor no later than 90 days before expiration of the license or certification, on a form approved by the Mayor, accompanied by the appropriate renewal fee established by the Mayor through rulemaking. An application for renewal submitted later than 90 days before expiration shall be subject to a late fee.

(b)

A license or certification issued pursuant to this chapter for which timely renewal application is made shall continue in force beyond the expiration date until the Mayor acts on the renewal application.

Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-357, § 15, 56 DCR 1167